Wyoming statutes. Title 9 Administration of the Government
Article 13. Long Term Care Ombudsman

Legislative intent. —

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 2, provides: “The legislature finds that a significant number of older Wyoming citizens reside in long term care facilities and are dependent on others for their protection and care. It is the intent of the legislature to encourage a high quality of care and life for the residents through the promotion of community involvement in long term care facilities and the establishment of a process to resolve complaints and problems of residents, the management of the facilities and other affected parties.”

Personnel. —

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 3, provides: “The number of personnel necessary to carry out the purpose of this act together with the personnel necessary to carry out the purpose of W.S.

9-2-1201

through

9-2-1207

is limited to a maximum of nine (9) positions in addition to the director of the [former] commission on aging.”

§ 9-2-1301.
Short title.

This act [§§

9-2-1301

through

9-2-1309

] may be cited as the “Long Term Care Ombudsman Act”.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1.

§ 9-2-1302.
Definitions.

As used in this act [§§

9-2-1301

through

9-2-1309

]:

Repealed by Laws 1991, ch. 221, § 3.

“Department” means the department of health;

“Director” means the director of the department;

“Division” means a division or section on aging as designated by the director;

“Long term care service” means any service, provided by an assisted living facility, adult day care facility, boarding home, home health agency, hospice, hospital swing bed, nursing care facility, personal care agency or other type of service subject to regulation, certification or licensure by the department, but not including habilitative care;

“Older Americans Act” means the federal Older Americans Act, as amended;

“Resident” means any adult who is receiving a long term care service.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, §§ 2, 3; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(v), which formerly defined “long term care facility”; added (a)(vi), redesignating former (a)(vi) as (a)(vii); and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

Older Americans Act. —

The federal Older Americans Act, referred to in subsection (a)(vi), appears as 42 U.S.C. §§ 3001 through 3057n.

§ 9-2-1303.
Office created.

There presently exists, pursuant to the Older Americans Act, the office of long term care ombudsman. The office is under the supervision of the department through its director or as otherwise directed by the department.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “the Older Americans Act” for “federal law.”

§ 9-2-1304.
Responsibilities.

The responsibilities of the ombudsman shall be to:

Investigate, advocate and mediate on behalf of adults applying for or receiving long term care services, to resolve complaints concerning actions or inactions that may adversely affect resident health, safety, welfare or rights and that do not involve determination of compliance for maintaining a license or certification;

Provide information to public agencies about the problems of residents receiving long term care services;

Carry out other activities consistent with the purpose of this act which the department determines appropriate; and

Monitor the development and implementation of federal, state and local laws, regulations and policies with respect to long term care services in Wyoming.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a)(i); deleted former (a)(iii), pertaining to the training of volunteers and the development of citizens organizations to participate in the ombudsman program, redesignating the remaining paragraphs in (a) accordingly; twice substituted “services” for “facilities”; and made related and stylistic changes.

Editor's notes. —

There is no subsection (b) in this section as it appears in the printed acts.

§ 9-2-1305.
Investigations.

The ombudsman shall conduct an appropriate inquiry into all complaints pursuant to this act [§§

9-2-1301

through

9-2-1309

]. The ombudsman shall notify any provider of a long term care service affected by the inquiry.

In conducting an inquiry, the ombudsman shall engage in appropriate actions including:

Making inquiries of affected parties or those with the knowledge of matters necessary to establish, deny or resolve the complaint;

Entering, at any reasonable time, the facility of a provider of any long term care service subject to regulation, certification or licensure by the department;

Presenting proper identification to any long term care service provider, if requested.

Any inquiry that requires the inspection or obtaining of medical records or other resident records which are pertinent to the inquiry shall comply with all established privacy notification requirements.

The resident, or resident’s guardian, may participate in planning any course of action to be taken on his behalf by the ombudsman.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 1991, ch. 221, § 2; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote (a) through (c), in part deleting provisions making notice discretionary, and in part requiring compliance with privacy notification requirements, and making stylistic changes.

§ 9-2-1306.
Resolution of complaints.

The ombudsman shall attempt to resolve the complaint using mediation and negotiation whenever possible.

Following an investigation, the ombudsman shall report his findings and recommendations to the resident or resident’s guardian and may report the findings to any other entity deemed appropriate.

The provider of long term care service complained against shall have a reasonable opportunity to respond to the complaint. If the problem seriously threatens the safety or well-being of a resident, the ombudsman shall refer the complaint to an appropriate agency.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, rewrote the section, in part, restructuring it, deleting the requirement that the ombudsman deliver the report of his investigation to the chief administrative officer of the facility or government agency affected, and deleting provisions for appeal.

§ 9-2-1307.
Confidentiality.

The identity of any resident on whose behalf a complaint is made, or any person providing information to an investigation shall be confidential. The identity of any person shall be disclosed only with the written permission of the individual. If the complaint becomes the subject of a judicial proceeding, the investigative information may be disclosed as required by the court.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1.

§ 9-2-1308.
Retaliation.

No person shall discriminate against any resident, relative or guardian of a resident, employee of a long term care service provider or any other person because of the making of a complaint or providing of information, in good faith, to the ombudsman.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1; 2005, ch. 133, § 1.

The 2005 amendment,

effective July 1, 2005, substituted “service provider” for “facility.”

§ 9-2-1309.
Access to ombudsman.

No resident shall be denied the right to contact the ombudsman.

History.

Laws 1985, ch. 229, § 1.